Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-5,216
Exemptions from act.

The Conveyance Safety Act does not apply to:

(1) Conveyances under the jurisdiction and subject to inspection by the United States Government;

(2) Conveyances used exclusively for agricultural purposes;

(3) Personnel hoists within the scope of American National Standards Institute A10.4, 2016 Edition;

(4) Material hoists within the scope of American National Standards Institute A10.5, 2013 Edition;

(5) Manlifts within the scope of American Society of Mechanical Engineers A90.1, 2015 Edition;

(6) Mobile scaffolds, towers, and platforms within the scope of American National Standards Institute A92.10, 2009 Edition;

(7) Powered platforms and equipment for exterior and interior maintenance within the scope of American National Standards Institute 120.1;

(8) Cranes, derricks, hoists, hooks, jacks, and slings within the scope of American Society of Mechanical Engineers B30.10, 2014 Edition;

(9) Portable equipment, except for portable escalators which are covered by American National Standards Institute A17.1, 2013 Edition;

(10) Tiering or piling machines used to move materials to and from storage located and operating entirely within one story;

(11) Equipment for feeding or positioning materials at machine tools, printing presses, and similar equipment;

(12) Skip or furnace hoists;

(13) Wharf ramps;

(14) Railroad car lifts or dumpers;

(15) Line jacks, false cars, shafters, moving platforms, and similar equipment used for installing a conveyance by an elevator contractor;

(16) Manlifts, hoists, or conveyances used in grain elevators or feed mills;

(17) Dock levelators;

(18) Stairway chair lifts and platform lifts; and

(19) Conveyances in residences located in counties that have a population of one hundred thousand or less inhabitants.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2508;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 52;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 21.